Utah statutes.
53-2-405.   Local government disaster funds.
(1) (a)  Subject to this section and notwithstanding anything to the contrary
contained in Title 10, Utah Municipal Code, or Title 17, Counties, Title 17B,
Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, or Title 17D,
Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, the governing body of a local
government may create and maintain by ordinance a special fund known as a
local government disaster fund.
(b)  The local fund shall consist of:
(i)  subject to the limitations of this section, monies transferred to it in
accordance with Subsection (2);
(ii)  any other public or private monies received by the local government that
are:
(A)  given to the local government for purposes consistent with this section;
and
(B)  deposited into the local fund at the request of:
(I)  the governing body of the local government; or
(II)  the person giving the monies; and
(iii)  interest or income realized from the local fund.
(c)  Interest or income realized from the local fund shall be deposited into
the local fund.
(d)  Monies in a local fund may be:
(i)  deposited or invested as provided in Section 51-7-11; or
(ii)  transferred by the local government treasurer to the state treasurer
under Section 51-7-5 for the state treasurer's management and control under
Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(e) (i)  The monies in a local fund may accumulate from year to year until the
local government governing body determines to spend any money in the local
fund for one or more of the purposes specified in Subsection (3).
(ii)  Monies in a local fund at the end of a fiscal year:
(A)  shall remain in the local fund for future use; and
(B)  may not be transferred to any other fund or used for any other purpose.
(2)  The amounts transferred to a local fund may not exceed 10% of the total
estimated revenues of the local government for the current fiscal period that
are not restricted or otherwise obligated.
(3)  Monies in the fund may only be used to fund the services and activities
of the local government creating the local fund in response to:
(a)  a declared disaster within the boundaries of the local government;
(b)  the aftermath of the disaster that gave rise to a declared disaster
within the boundaries of the local government; and
(c)  subject to Subsection (5), emergency preparedness.
(4) (a)  A local fund is subject to this part and:
(i)  in the case of a town, Title 10, Chapter 5, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act
for Utah Towns, except that:
(A)  in addition to the funds listed in Section 10-5-106, the mayor shall
prepare a budget for the local fund;
(B)  Section 10-5-119 addressing termination of special funds does not apply
to a local fund; and
(C)  the council of the town may not authorize an interfund loan under Section
10-5-120 from the local fund;
(ii)  in the case of a city, Title 10, Chapter 6, Uniform Fiscal Procedures
Act for Utah Cities, except that:
(A)  in addition to the funds listed in Section 10-6-109, the mayor shall
prepare a budget for the local fund;
(B)  Section 10-6-131 addressing termination of special funds does not apply
to a local fund; and
(C)  the governing body of the city may not authorize an interfund loan under
Section 10-6-132 from the local fund; and
(iii)  in the case of a county, Title 17, Chapter 36, Uniform Fiscal
Procedures Act for Counties, except that:
(A)  Section 17-36-29 addressing termination of special funds does not apply
to a local fund; and
(B)  the governing body of the county may not authorize an interfund loan
under Section 17-36-30 from the local fund; and
(iv)  in the case of a local district or special service district, Title 17B,
Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures for Local Districts, except that:
(A)  Section 17B-1-625, addressing termination of a special fund, does not
apply to a local fund; and
(B)  the governing body of the local district or special service district may
not authorize an interfund loan under Section 17B-1-626 from the local fund.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), transfers of monies to a local fund or
the accumulation of monies in a local fund do not affect any limits on fund
balances, net assets, or the accumulation of retained earnings in any of the
following of a local government:
(i)  a general fund;
(ii)  an enterprise fund;
(iii)  an internal service fund; or
(iv)  any other fund.
(5) (a)  A local government may not expend during a fiscal year more than 10%
of the monies budgeted to be deposited into a local fund during that fiscal
year for emergency preparedness.
(b)  The amount described in Subsection (5)(a) shall be determined before the
adoption of the tentative budget.
